Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-752
Act;
liberal construction.

The Residential
Mortgage Licensing Act shall be construed liberally so as to effectuate
its purposes.

Laws 1989, LB 272, § 22;

R.S.1943, (2004), § 45-719;

Laws 2009, LB328, § 37.